District of Columbia statutes.
46-302.08

Child support orders for 2 or more obligees.

In responding to registrations or petitions for enforcement of 2 or more child support orders in effect at the same time with regard to the same obligor and different individual obligees, at least one of which was issued by a tribunal of another state, a tribunal of the District shall enforce those orders in the same manner as if the orders had been issued by a tribunal of the District.

History

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 208, 42 DCR 6748
June 22, 2006, D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(b)(3)(C), 53 DCR 3634

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 30-342.8.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-137, in the section heading, deleted “Multiple” preceding “child”; and deleted “multiple” preceding “registrations” and “orders”.

Effective Dates

Applicability: Section 3 of D.C. Law 16-137 provided: “This act shall apply as of April 1, 2007.”

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 208 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (2001 Act).